Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-109
Reservation of name.

(RULLCA 109) (a) A person may reserve the
exclusive use of the name of a limited liability company, including a fictitious
or assumed name for a foreign limited liability company whose name is not
available, by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing.
The application must state the name and address of the applicant and the name
proposed to be reserved. If the Secretary of State finds that the name applied
for is available, it must be reserved for the applicant's exclusive use for
a one-hundred-twenty-day period.

(b) The owner of a name
reserved for a limited liability company may transfer the reservation to another
person by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing a signed notice
of the transfer which states the name and address of the transferee.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 9.